Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.92.085

Part-time students—Review of financial aid policies and procedures.

Institutions of higher education are encouraged to review their policies and procedures regarding financial aid for students taking a less-than-half-time course load, and to implement policies and procedures providing students taking a less-than-half-time course load with the same access to institutional aid, including tuition waivers, as provided to students enrolled half time or more.

[ 2007 c 404 s 3.]